ne_affix.dat
SFX W Y 127
SFX W 0 ँदारहेछौ [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नेथियो [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नुपरिरहेको [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नेगर्दछ [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नुहुन्न [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नेछन् [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नुपर्ला [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नुपर्दछ [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नुछ [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नलाग्यो [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नुभएनछ [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नुभयो [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नुभएर [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नुभएको [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नुभएन [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नुभएका [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नुभएछ [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नुपर्दा [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नुपर्दो [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नुपर्नेछ [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नुपर्थ्यो [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नुपर्दैन [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नुपर्दैनथ्यो [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नुपरेर [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नुपरे [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नुपरेको [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नुपरेन [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नुपरेका [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नुपर्नेबारे [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नुपर्यो [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नुपर्ने [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नुपर्छ [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नुपरेछ [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नुहुने [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नुहुन [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नुहुँदै [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नुहुँदा [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नुहुन्थ्यो [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नुहुँदैछ [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नुहुँदैनथ्यो [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नुहोस् [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नुहोला [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नुहुनेबारे [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नुहुन्छ [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नुहुनेछ [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नुहुँदैन [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 दोरहेछु [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 दोरहेछौ [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 दारहेछौँ [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 दोरहेछस् [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 दोरहेछ [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्यो [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसके [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्छ [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसकेछ [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्नेछ [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्नेछन् [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्नु [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्ने [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्दी [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्दो [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्छु [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्छौ [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्छस् [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्छौँ [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्छेस् [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्छन् [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्छिन् [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्नेछौँ [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्नेछौ [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्छ्यौ [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्छे [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्नेछस् [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्थिस् [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्थ्यौ [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्थ्यौँ [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्थे [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्थ्यो [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्थी [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्थिन् [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्दैन [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्दैनौ [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्दैनौँ [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्दिनौ [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्दैनन् [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्नेछु [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्दैनथ्यो [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्दैनथे [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्यौँ [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्यौ [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसकेनन् [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसकेर [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसकेन [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसकेनौ [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसकेनौँ [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसकेस् [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसकोस् [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसकेछन् [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसकेछौ [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसकुन्जेल [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसकिन् [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसकिन [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसकिनस् [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसकिँन [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसकिनौ [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसकिनन् [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसकिस् [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसकी [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसकिनेछ [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसकिएला [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसकुन् [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसकिछस् [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसकिछन् [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसकिछ [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसकूँ [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसकेको [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसकेका [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्ला [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्नेबारे [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्नुहुन्छ [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्नुभयो [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्नुहुन्थ्यो [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसकिएछ [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 नसक्दछ [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 िएछ [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 /u [^उइि्]
SFX W 0 /V [^उइि्]

SFX w Y 6
SFX w 0 /V [ा]
SFX w ु /V [ु]
SFX w ा /u [ा]
SFX w 0 /u [ु]
SFX w ा /V [ा]
SFX w 0 /V [ु]

SFX X Y 124
SFX X 0 ँदारहेछौ .
SFX X 0 नेथियो .
SFX X 0 नुपरिरहेको .
SFX X 0 नेगर्दछ .
SFX X 0 नुहुन्न .
SFX X 0 नेछन् .
SFX X 0 नुपर्ला .
SFX X 0 नुपर्दछ .
SFX X 0 नुछ .
SFX X 0 नलाग्यो .
SFX X 0 नुभएनछ .
SFX X 0 नुभयो .
SFX X 0 नुभएर .
SFX X 0 नुभएको .
SFX X 0 नुभएन .
SFX X 0 नुभएका .
SFX X 0 नुभएछ .
SFX X 0 नुपर्दा .
SFX X 0 नुपर्दो .
SFX X 0 नुपर्नेछ .
SFX X 0 नुपर्थ्यो .
SFX X 0 नुपर्दैन .
SFX X 0 नुपर्दैनथ्यो .
SFX X 0 नुपरेर .
SFX X 0 नुपरे .
SFX X 0 नुपरेको .
SFX X 0 नुपरेन .
SFX X 0 नुपरेका .
SFX X 0 नुपर्नेबारे .
SFX X 0 नुपर्यो .
SFX X 0 नुपर्ने .
SFX X 0 नुपर्छ .
SFX X 0 नुपरेछ .
SFX X 0 नुहुने .
SFX X 0 नुहुन .
SFX X 0 नुहुँदै .
SFX X 0 नुहुँदा .
SFX X 0 नुहुन्थ्यो .
SFX X 0 नुहुँदैछ .
SFX X 0 नुहुँदैनथ्यो .
SFX X 0 नुहोस् .
SFX X 0 नुहोला .
SFX X 0 नुहुनेबारे .
SFX X 0 नुहुन्छ .
SFX X 0 नुहुनेछ .
SFX X 0 नुहुँदैन .
SFX X 0 ँदोरहेछु .
SFX X 0 ँदोरहेछौ .
SFX X 0 ँदारहेछौँ .
SFX X 0 ँदोरहेछस् .
SFX X 0 ँदोरहेछ .
SFX X 0 नसक्यो .
SFX X 0 नसके .
SFX X 0 नसक्छ .
SFX X 0 नसकेछ .
SFX X 0 नसक्नेछ .
SFX X 0 नसक्नेछन् .
SFX X 0 नसक्नु .
SFX X 0 नसक्ने .
SFX X 0 नसक्दी .
SFX X 0 नसक्दो .
SFX X 0 नसक्छु .
SFX X 0 नसक्छौ .
SFX X 0 नसक्छस् .
SFX X 0 नसक्छौँ .
SFX X 0 नसक्छेस् .
SFX X 0 नसक्छन् .
SFX X 0 नसक्छिन् .
SFX X 0 नसक्नेछौँ .
SFX X 0 नसक्नेछौ .
SFX X 0 नसक्छ्यौ .
SFX X 0 नसक्छे .
SFX X 0 नसक्नेछस् .
SFX X 0 नसक्थिस् .
SFX X 0 नसक्थ्यौ .
SFX X 0 नसक्थ्यौँ .
SFX X 0 नसक्थे .
SFX X 0 नसक्थ्यो .
SFX X 0 नसक्थी .
SFX X 0 नसक्थिन् .
SFX X 0 नसक्दैन .
SFX X 0 नसक्दैनौ .
SFX X 0 नसक्दैनौँ .
SFX X 0 नसक्दिनौ .
SFX X 0 नसक्दैनन् .
SFX X 0 नसक्नेछु .
SFX X 0 नसक्दैनथ्यो .
SFX X 0 नसक्दैनथे .
SFX X 0 नसक्यौँ .
SFX X 0 नसक्यौ .
SFX X 0 नसकेनन् .
SFX X 0 नसकेर .
SFX X 0 नसकेन .
SFX X 0 नसकेनौ .
SFX X 0 नसकेनौँ .
SFX X 0 नसकेस् .
SFX X 0 नसकोस् .
SFX X 0 नसकेछन् .
SFX X 0 नसकेछौ .
SFX X 0 नसकुन्जेल .
SFX X 0 नसकिन् .
SFX X 0 नसकिन .
SFX X 0 नसकिनस् .
SFX X 0 नसकिँन .
SFX X 0 नसकिनौ .
SFX X 0 नसकिनन् .
SFX X 0 नसकिस् .
SFX X 0 नसकी .
SFX X 0 नसकिनेछ .
SFX X 0 नसकिएला .
SFX X 0 नसकुन् .
SFX X 0 नसकिछस् .
SFX X 0 नसकिछन् .
SFX X 0 नसकिछ .
SFX X 0 नसकूँ .
SFX X 0 नसकेको .
SFX X 0 नसकेका .
SFX X 0 नसक्ला .
SFX X 0 नसक्नेबारे .
SFX X 0 नसक्नुहुन्छ .
SFX X 0 नसक्नुभयो .
SFX X 0 नसक्नुहुन्थ्यो .
SFX X 0 नसकिएछ .
SFX X 0 नसक्दछ .
